Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.050

Claims on fidelity bonds—Remedies.

(1) A person who claims to have sustained damages by reason of the fraudulent act or covered dishonest act of an exchange facilitator or an exchange facilitator's employee may file a claim on the fidelity bond.

(2) The remedies provided under this section are cumulative and nonexclusive and do not affect any other remedy available at law.

[ 2013 c 228 s 3; 2009 c 70 s 6.]